Maryland, session 2025, HB0316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
1–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(o) (1) “9–1–1 specialist” means an employee of a county public safety
answering point, or an employee working in a county public safety answering point, whose
duties and responsibilities include:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0316*

HOUSE BILL 316
[(1)] (I) receiving and processing 9–1–1 requests for emergency services;
[(2)] (II) other support functions directly related to 9–1–1 requests for
emergency services; or
[(3)] (III) dispatching law enforcement officers, fire rescue services,
emergency medical services, and other public safety services to the scene of an emergency.
(2) “9–1–1 SPECIALIST” INCLUDES A 9–1–1 TECHNICIAN WHO IS AN
EMPLOYEE OF A PUBLIC SAFETY ANSWERING POINT OR AN EMPLOYEE WORKING IN
A PUBLIC SAFETY ANSWERING POINT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.